California, session 20252026, AB961.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25395.109 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25395.109. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2037, deletes or extends that date.SEC. 2. Section 25395.110 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:25395.110. (a) A person who, before January 1, 2037, qualifies for immunity pursuant to Chapter 6.82 (commencing with Section 25395.60), as that chapter read on December 31, 2036, shall continue to have that immunity on and after January 1, 2037, if the person continues to be in compliance with the requirements of former Chapter 6.82 (commencing with Section 25395.60), including, but not limited to, compliance with all response plans approved pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 25395.90) of former Chapter 6.82, and compliance with all other applicable laws.(b) This article shall become operative on January 1, 2037.